Utah statutes.
57-8-34.   Persons subject to provisions and agreements.

(1) All unit owners, tenants of such owners, employees of owners and tenants, or any other person who may in any manner use the property or any part thereof submitted to the provisions of this act shall be subject to this act and to the declaration and bylaws adopted pursuant to the provisions of this act.

(2)  All agreements, decisions and determinations lawfully made by the manager, management committee or by the association of unit owners in accordance with this act, the declaration or bylaws, shall be deemed to be binding on all unit owners.

